hr-HR: Vrsta oštrice: Zaobljena; Plosnata; Šuplja; Ravna; Ostalo
sv: Bladtyp: Böjd; Platt; Ihålig; Rakt; Övrigt
en: Blade type: Curved; Flat; Hollow; Straight; Other
zh-TW: 刀刃類型: 弧形; 平坦; 空心; 直; 其他
vi: Loại lưỡi: Cong; Phẳng; Rỗng; Tóc thẳng; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de lâmina: Curvada; Plana; Vazio; Liso; Outro
sk-SK: Typ čepele: Zakrivený; Plochý; Dutý; Rovný; Iné
ko: 블레이드 유형: 곡선형; 플랫; 할로우; 일자형; 기타
th: ประเภทใบมีด: โค้ง; ราบ; รูกลวง; ผมตรง; อื่นๆ
da: Bladtype: Buet; Flad; Hul; Lige; Andet
hu: Penge típusa: Íves; Lapos; Üreges; Egyenes; Egyéb
lt-LT: Ašmenų tipas: Lenkti; Plokšti; Tuščiaviduriai; Tiesūs; Kita
pl: Typ ostrza: Zakrzywiony; Płaski; Płytki; Prosta; Inne
ro-RO: Tip lamă: Curbată; Plată; Gol; Dreaptă; Altele
de: Kufentyp: Gebogen; Flach; Hohl; Glatt; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di lama: Curvo; Piatto; Cava; Dritto; Altro
ru: Тип лезвия: Изогнутый; Плоский; Пустой; Прямой; Другой
fi: Terätyyppi: Kaareva; Tasainen; Ontto; Suorat; Muu
bg-BG: Тип острие: Извито; Плоско; Кухо; Право; Други
es: Tipo de hoja: Curva; Puro; Hueco; Liso; Otros
nb: Bladtype: Buet; Flat; Hul; Rett; Annet
tr: Bıçak Tipi: Kavisli; Düz; Oyuk; Düz; Diğer
nl: Bladtype: Gebogen; Vlak; Hol; Steil; Andere
cs: Typ čepele: Zaoblený; Plochý; Dutý; Rovné; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta rezila: Ukrivljeno; Ravno; Votlo; Ravno; Drugo
ja: 刃の種類: カーブド; フラット; 中空; ストレート; その他
fr: Type de lame: Incurvée; Plate; Creusée; Lisses; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de lâmina: Curvado; Plano; Oco; Liso; Outro
el: Τύπος λεπίδας: Καμπυλωτή; Επίπεδη; Κοίλη; Ευθεία; Άλλο
zh-CN: 刀片类型: 弯曲的; 扁平的; 中空; 直; 其他